Hawaii statutes.
§580-25 Inheritance by children. The
children of such illegal marriage shall be entitled to succeed in the same
manner as legitimate children, to all the real and personal estate of both
parents in the State. [CC 1859, §1317; RL 1925, §2959; RL 1935, §4454; RL 1945,
§12205; RL 1955, §324-5; HRS §580-25]

Case Notes

Cited: 20 H. 722, 723.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next